sl-SI: Starostna skupina dojenčkov: 0–24 mesecev; 0–3 mesecev; 0–6 mesecev; 1–2 leti; 12 mesecev ali več; 2–3 let; 24 mesecev ali več; 3 leta ali več; 3–6 mesecev; 6 mesecev ali več; 6–12 mesecev; 9 mesecev ali več; Vse starosti; Novorojenček; Drugo
fr: Tranche d’âge du bébé: 0-24 mois; 0-3 mois; 0-6 mois; 1-2 ans; 12 mois ou plus; 2-3 ans; 24 mois ou plus; 3 ans ou plus; 3-6 mois; 6 mois ou plus; 6-12 mois; 9 mois ou plus; Tous âges; Nouveau-né; Autre
sv: Åldersgrupp för spädbarn: 0–24 månader; 0–3 månader; 0–6 månader; 1–2 år; 12 månader eller äldre; 2–3 år; 24 månader eller äldre; 3 år eller äldre; 3–6 månader; 6 månader eller äldre; 6–12 månader; 9 månader eller äldre; Alla åldrar; Nyfödd; Annat
sk-SK: Detská veková skupina: 0-24 mesiacov; 0-3 mesiace; 0-6 mesiacov; 1-2 roky; 12 mesiacov alebo viac; 2-3 roky; 24 mesiacov alebo viac; 3 roky alebo viac; 3-6 mesiacov; 6 mesiacov alebo viac; 6-12 mesiacov; 9 mesiacov alebo viac; Všetky vekové kategórie; Novorodenec; Iné
vi: Nhóm tuổi sơ sinh: 0-24 tháng; 0-3 tháng; 0-6 tháng; 1-2 tuổi; 12 tháng trở lên; 2-3 tuổi; 24 tháng trở lên; 3 tuổi trở lên; 3-6 tháng; 6 tháng trở lên; 6-12 tháng; 9 tháng trở lên; Mọi lứa tuổi; Trẻ sơ sinh; Khác
en: Infant age group: 0-24 months; 0-3 months; 0-6 months; 1-2 years; 12 months or older; 2-3 years; 24 months or older; 3 years or older; 3-6 months; 6 months or older; 6-12 months; 9 months or older; All ages; Newborn; Other
pl: Grupa wiekowa niemowląt: 0-24 miesiące; 0-3 miesiące; 0-6 miesięcy; 1-2 lata; 12 miesięcy lub więcej; 2-3 lata; 24 miesięcy lub więcej; 3 lata lub więcej; 3-6 miesięcy; 6 miesięcy lub więcej; 6-12 miesięcy; 9 miesięcy lub więcej; Wszystkie grupy wiekowe; Noworodek; Pozostałe
zh-CN: 婴幼儿年龄段: 0-24 个月; 0-3 个月; 0-6 个月; 1-2 岁; 12 个月或以上; 2-3 岁; 24 个月或以上; 3 岁或以上; 3-6 个月; 6 个月或以上; 6-12 个月; 9 个月或以上; 所有年龄段; 新生儿; 其他
es: Grupo de edad de infantes: 0 a 24 meses; 0 a 3 meses; 0 a 6 meses; 1 a 2 años; 12 meses o más; 2 a 3 años; 24 meses o más; 3 años o más; 3 a 6 meses; 6 meses o más; 6 a 12 meses; 9 meses o más; Todas las edades; Recién nacido; Otros
nl: Leeftijdsgroep peuter: 0-24 maanden; 0-3 maanden; 0-6 maanden; 1-2 jaar; 12 maanden of ouder; 2-3 jaar; 24 maanden of ouder; 3 jaar of ouder; 3-6 maanden; 6 maanden of ouder; 6-12 maanden; 9 maanden of ouder; Alle leeftijden; Pasgeborene; Andere
pt-PT: Grupo etário dos bebés: 0–24 meses; 0–3 meses; 0–6 meses; 1 – 2 anos; 12 meses ou mais; 2 -3 anos; 24 meses ou mais; 3 anos ou mais; 3–6 meses; 6 meses ou mais; 6–12 meses; 9 meses ou mais; Todas as idades; Recém-nascido; Outro
nb: Aldersgruppe for babyer: 0–24 måneder; 0–3 måneder; 0–6 måneder; 1–2 år; 12 år eller eldre; 2–3 år; 24 måneder eller eldre; 3 år eller eldre; 3–6 måneder; 6 måneder eller eldre; 6–12 måneder; 9 måneder eller eldre; Alle aldre; Nyfødt; Annen
ro-RO: Grup de vârstă sugari: 0-24 luni; 0-3 luni; 0-6 luni; 1-2 ani; 12 luni sau peste; 2-3 ani; 24 de luni sau peste; 3 ani sau peste; 3-6 luni; 6 luni sau peste; 6-12 luni; 9 luni sau peste; Toate vârstele; Nou-născut; Altele
hr-HR: Dobna skupina djece: 0 – 24 mjeseca; 0 – 3 mjeseca; 0 – 6 mjeseci; 1 – 2 godine; 12 mjeseci ili više; 2 – 3 godine; 24 mjeseca ili više; 3 godine ili više; 3 – 6 mjeseci; 6 mjeseci ili više; 6 – 12 mjeseci; 9 mjeseci ili više; Sve dobne skupine; Novorođenče; Ostalo
de: Kleinkinder-Altersgruppe: 0 – 24 Monate; 0–3 Monate; 0 – 6 Monate; 1 – 2 Jahre; 12 Monate oder älter; 2–3 Jahre; 24 Monate oder älter; 3 Jahre oder älter; 3–6 Monate; 6 Monate oder älter; 6 – 12 Monate; 9 Monate oder älter; Jedes Alter; Neugeborenes; Sonstiges
th: กลุ่มอายุทารก: 0-24 เดือน; 0-3 เดือน; 0-6 เดือน; 1-2 ปี; 12 เดือนขึ้นไป; 2-3 ปี; 24 เดือนขึ้นไป; 3 ปีขึ้นไป; 3-6 เดือน; 6 เดือนขึ้นไป; 6-12 เดือน; 9 เดือนขึ้นไป; ทุกวัย; ทารกแรกเกิด; อื่นๆ
tr: Bebek yaş grubu: 0-24 ay; 0-3 ay; 0-6 ay; 1-2 yaş; 12 ay veya üzeri; 2-3 yaş; 24 ay ve üzeri; 3 yaş ve üzeri; 3-6 ay; 6 ay ve üzeri; 6-12 ay; 9 ay ve üzeri; Tüm yaşlar; Yenidoğan; Diğer
zh-TW: 嬰兒年齡層: 0-24 個月; 0-3 個月; 0-6 個月; 1-2 歲; 12 個月以上; 2-3 歲; 24 個月以上; 3 歲以上; 3-6 個月; 6 個月以上; 6-12 個月; 9 個月以上; 所有年齡段; 新生兒; 其他
hu: Csecsemő életszakasza: 0–24 hónap; 0–3 hónap; 0–6 hónap; 1–2 év; 12+ hónap; 2–3 év; 24+ hónap; 3+ év; 3–6 hónap; 6+ hónap; 6–12 hónap; 9+ hónap; Minden korosztály; Újszülött; Egyéb
ru: Возрастная группа младенцев: 0–24 мес.; 0–3 мес.; 0–6 мес.; 1–2 года; 12 лет и старше; 2–3 года; 24 мес. и старше; 3 года и старше; 3–6 мес.; 6 мес. и старше; 6–12 мес.; 9 мес. и старше; Все возрасты; Новорожденные; Другая
da: Spædbørnsaldersgruppe: 0-24 måneder; 0-3 måneder; 0-6 måneder; 1-2 år; 12 måneder eller ældre; 2-3 år; 24 måneder eller ældre; 3 år eller ældre; 3-6 måneder; 6 måneder eller ældre; 6-12 måneder; 9 måneder eller ældre; Alle aldre; Nyfødt; Andet
pt-BR: Faixa etária da criança: 0-24 meses; 0-3 meses; 0-6 meses; 1-2 anos; 12 meses ou mais; 2-3 anos; 24 meses ou mais; 3 anos ou mais; 3-6 meses; 6 meses ou mais; 6-12 meses; 9 meses ou mais; Todas as idades; Recém-nascido; Outro
fi: Pikkulapsen ikäryhmä: 0–24-kuukautiset; 0–3-kuukautiset; 0–6-kuukautiset; 1–2-vuotiaat; 12-kuukautiset tai vanhemmat; 2–3-vuotiaat; 24-kuukautiset tai vanhemmat; 3-vuotiaat tai vanhemmat; 3–6-kuukautiset; 6-kuukautiset tai vanhemmat; 6–12-kuukautiset; 9-kuukautiset tai vanhemmat; Kaikenikäiset; Vastasyntynyt; Muu
bg-BG: Възрастова група на бебета: 0-24 месеца; 0-3 месеца; 0-6 месеца; 1-2 години; 12 месеца или повече; 2-3 години; 24 месеца или повече; 3 години или повече; 3-6 месеца; 6 месеца или повече; 6-12 месеца; 9 месеца или повече; Всички възрасти; Новородено; Други
lt-LT: Kūdikių amžiaus grupė: 0–24 mėn.; 0–3 mėn.; 0–6 mėn.; 1–2 metai; 12+ mėn.; 2–3 metai; 24+ mėn.; 3+ metai; 3–6 mėn.; 6+ mėn.; 6–12 mėn.; 9+ mėn.; Bet kokiam amžiui; Naujagimiams; Kita
it: Fascia di età del bambino: 0-24 mesi; 0-3 mesi; 0-6 mesi; 1-2 anni; 12 mesi o più; 2-3 anni; 24 mesi o più; 3 anni o più; 3-6 mesi; 6 mesi o più; 6-12 mesi; 9 mesi o più; Tutte le età; Bimbi; Altro
cs: Věková skupina kojenců: 0–24 měsíců; 0–3 měsíce; 0–6 měsíců; 1–2 roky; 12 měsíců nebo starší; 2–3 roky; 24 měsíců nebo starší; 3 roky nebo starší; 3–6 měsíců; 6 měsíců nebo starší; 6–12 měsíců; 9 měsíců nebo starší; Všechny věkové kategorie; Novorozenci; Jiné
ja: 幼児の年齢層: 0～24か月; 0～3か月; 0～6か月; 1～2歳; 12か月以上; 2～3才; 24か月以上; 3歳以上; 3～6か月; 6か月以上; 6～12か月; 9か月以上; 全年齢; 新生; その他
el: Βρεφική ηλικιακή ομάδα: 0-24 μηνών; 0-3 μηνών; 0-6 μηνών; 1-2 ετών; 12 μηνών και άνω; 2-3 ετών; 24 μηνών και άνω; 3 ετών και άνω; 3-6 μηνών; 6 μηνών και άνω; 6-12 μηνών; 9 μηνών και άνω; Όλες οι ηλικίες; Νεογέννητο; Άλλο
ko: 유아 연령대: 0~24개월; 0~3개월; 0~6개월; 1~2세; 12개월 이상; 2~3년; 24개월 이상; 3세 이상; 3~6개월; 6개월 이상; 6~12개월; 9개월 이상; 전 연령대; 신생아; 기타